California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) (1) Commencing July 1, 2022, the division shall begin requiring each operator of an oil or gas well to submit a report to the supervisor that demonstrates the operator’s total liability to plug and abandon all wells and to decommission all attendant production facilities, including any needed site remediation, pursuant to Section 3208 and Article 4.2 (commencing with Section 3250), as applicable, on a schedule determined by the supervisor.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the supervisor shall set the schedule in a manner that staggers the initial reports by operators to ensure that some reporting commences on July 1, 2022, that at least one-half of required operators will have submitted their initial report by July 1, 2024, that all
 initial reporting is completed by July 1, 2026, and that followup reporting is required for each operator on a continual basis that is no less frequent than every five years after the initial report.

(b) The division shall develop criteria to be used by operators for estimating costs to plug and abandon wells and decommission attendant production facilities, including site remediation. The criteria shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following requirements:

(1) Operators shall calculate the estimated cost to plug and abandon each well and decommission attendant production facilities of the operator using the criteria developed by the division pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) For the site of each well, attendant production facility, or lease, the operator shall calculate the estimated cost of full site
 remediation using criteria developed by the division pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) Calculations of estimated costs under this subdivision shall be determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board.

(c) In preparing each report for the supervisor pursuant to subdivision (a), the operator shall do both of the following:

(1) Calculate cost estimates to plug and abandon wells and decommission attendant production facilities, including site remediation, using the criteria developed by the division pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) Exclude from each initial report due on or before July 1, 2026, all offshore wells and facilities of the operator evaluated pursuant to Section 3205.6.
 Include in each followup report due after July 1, 2026, all offshore wells and facilities of the operator.

(d) If the supervisor determines that the operator has failed to use the requisite criteria or has otherwise provided estimates in the report that are neither credible nor accurate, the supervisor may request the operator to submit revised estimates for review and approval on a timely schedule to be determined by the supervisor. Failure to comply with this requirement or a request pursuant to this section is a violation of this chapter and is subject to any penalty provided by law, including, but not limited to, Sections 3236 and 3236.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 236.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3205.8.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a person who acquires the right to operate a well or production facility, by purchase, transfer, assignment, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition, except a well that has an average daily production level that exceeds 15 barrels of oil or 60,000 cubic feet of natural gas during the 12 months preceding the date of acquisition or a natural gas storage well, shall, as soon as possible, but not later than the date when the acquisition of the well or production facility becomes final, file with the supervisor an individual indemnity bond for the well or production facility, or a blanket
 indemnity bond for multiple wells or production facilities, in an amount determined by the supervisor to be sufficient to cover, in full, all costs of plugging and abandonment, decommissioning of the facility, and site restoration pursuant to Section 3208 and regulations implementing this chapter.

(2) A person who acquires the right to operate more than one well or production facility, by purchase, transfer, assignment, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition, or who operates more than one well or production facility may file with the supervisor one blanket indemnity bond to cover all the operations in any of its wells in the state in lieu of an individual indemnity bond for each operation. The blanket indemnity bond shall be executed by the operator, as principal, and by an authorized surety company, as surety, and shall be in
 substantially the same language and upon the same conditions as provided in Section 3204, except for the difference in the amount.

(b) A person who intends to acquire the right to operate a well or production facility, by purchase, transfer, assignment, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition, shall submit a request to the supervisor for a determination of the amount of the bond required pursuant to subdivision (a) before completing the acquisition and shall not complete the acquisition until the determination is received and the bond has been filed with the supervisor.

(c) The supervisor shall determine the amount of an individual indemnity bond required pursuant to subdivision (a) based on the supervisor’s determination of the full costs of plugging and
 abandonment, decommissioning the facility, and site restoration
 using any reasonable method, including, but not limited to, consideration of the factors listed in subdivision (b) of Section 3205.3, or the cost estimation criteria described in subdivision (b) of Section 3205.7, or consultation with a contractor to obtain an estimate of the cost to plug and abandon the wells, decommission the facility, and complete site restoration. The supervisor shall determine the amount of a blanket indemnity bond required pursuant to subdivision (a) based on the sum total of combining the costs from the same determinations as individual indemnity bonds for each well or production facility covered by the blanket indemnity bond.

(d) In lieu of the bond required to be provided pursuant to subdivision (a), the operator may, with the written approval of
 the supervisor, provide the required security through an equally effective means of financial assurance, which includes a deposit pursuant to Section 3205.5, an irrevocable letter of credit, or a fully funded trust fund, but does not include self-insurance or corporate guarantees. The required financial assurance may be obtained or funded by the transferor of the covered well.

(e) The department shall post on its internet website the information on all indemnity bond determinations made by the supervisor, and shall include for each determination the bond amount and calculations
 used.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 359, Sec. 6.   (AB 1167)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3206.

(a) No later than May 1 of each year, the operator of any idle well shall do either of the following:

(1) For each idle well that was an idle well at any time in the last calendar year, file with the supervisor an annual fee equal to the sum of the following amounts:

(A) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for each idle well that has been an idle well for less than three years.

(B) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each idle well that has been an idle well for three years or longer, but less than eight years.

(C) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each idle well that
 has been an idle well for 8 years or longer, but less than 15 years.

(D) Twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500) for each idle well that has been an idle well 15 years or longer, but less than 20 years.

(E) (i) Until January 1, 2029, twenty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($22,500) for each idle well that has been an idle well for 20 years or longer.

(ii) On and after January 1, 2029, twenty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($22,500) for each idle well that has been an idle well for 20 years or longer, but less than 25 years.

(F) On and after January 1, 2029, sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) for each idle well that has been an idle well for 25 years or longer.

(2) File a plan with the supervisor to provide for the management and elimination of all idle wells. For purposes of the plan, elimination of an idle well shall be accomplished when the well has been properly abandoned in accordance with Section 3208, or it has been shown to the division’s satisfaction that, since the well became an idle well, the well has maintained production of oil or gas, maintained production of water used in production stimulation, or been used for enhanced oil recovery, reservoir pressure management, or injection for a continuous six-month period. The plan shall comply with all of the following:

(A) Specify the calendar year or years that it covers. The plan and any renewal of the plan shall cover a time period of up to eight years.

(B) Require the operator to consider all of the following when prioritizing idle wells for plugging and
 abandonment, in addition to priorities identified by the supervisor in regulations:

(i) The age of the idle well.

(ii) Any indication that the idle well potentially poses a threat to life, health, property, or natural resources.

(iii) Wells that are located within 3,200 feet of a sensitive receptor, as defined in Section 3280.

(C) Include notes indicating the basis for prioritizing wells.

(D) Be subject to approval by the supervisor, who may prioritize the order in which idle wells are addressed.

(E) Be reviewed for performance annually by the supervisor, and be subject to amendment by the supervisor, or by the operator with
 the approval of the supervisor. An updated plan shall be required if there is a change in ownership or holdings of the operator.

(F) The required rate of idle well elimination shall be based upon the number of idle wells under the control of an operator on January 1 of each year, as specified in subparagraph (G). If the operator has eliminated more wells than required in calendar year 2024 or any subsequent calendar year, the supervisor may deduct from the new requirement the number of idle wells eliminated in excess of those previously required. In addition, the supervisor may require additional well testing requirements as part of the plan.

(G) (i) For calendar years 2025 to 2027, inclusive, unless and until the operator has no idle wells, require that operators with 250 or fewer idle wells eliminate at least 5 percent of their idle wells each year, and, in
 no case, less than 1 idle well; operators with 251 to 1,250, inclusive, idle wells eliminate at least 6 percent of their idle wells each year; operators with 1,251 to 3,000, inclusive, idle wells eliminate at least 7 percent of their idle wells each year; and operators with more than 3,000 idle wells eliminate at least 15 percent of their idle wells each year.

(ii) For calendar years 2028 and 2029, unless and until the operator has no idle wells, require that operators with 250 or fewer idle wells eliminate at least 6 percent of their idle wells each year, and, in no case, less than 1 idle well; operators with 251 to 1,250, inclusive, idle wells eliminate at least 8 percent of their idle wells each year; operators with 1,251 to 3,000, inclusive, idle wells eliminate at least 10 percent of their idle wells each year; and operators with more than 3,000 idle wells eliminate at least 18 percent of their idle wells each year.

(iii) For calendar year 2030 and all subsequent calendar years, unless and until the operator has no idle wells, require that operators with 250 or fewer idle wells eliminate at least 8 percent of their idle wells each year, and, in no case, less than 1 idle well; operators with 251 to 1,250, inclusive, idle wells eliminate at least 10 percent of their idle wells each year; operators with 1,251 to 3,000, inclusive, idle wells eliminate at least 15 percent of their idle wells each year; and operators with more than 3,000 idle wells eliminate at least 20 percent of their idle wells each year.

(H) An operator who fails to comply with the plan, as determined by the supervisor after the annual performance review, is not eligible to use the requirements of this paragraph, for purposes of compliance with this section, for any of its idle wells. An operator may appeal to the director
 pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 3350) regarding the supervisor’s rejection of a plan and plan amendments and the supervisor’s determination of the operator’s failure to comply with a plan. If the supervisor’s determination that the operator failed to comply with the plan is not timely appealed, or if the director upholds the supervisor’s determination upon appeal, the operator shall immediately file the fees required under paragraph (1) for each year that the operator failed to comply with the plan. That operator may not propose a new idle well plan under this paragraph for the next two years and then only if the operator has paid all required idle well fees and any associated late payment penalties and interest.

(b) All fees received under this section shall be deposited in the Hazardous and Idle-Deserted Well Abatement Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the
 moneys in the Hazardous and Idle-Deserted Well Abatement Fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the department for expenditure without regard to fiscal year, to mitigate a hazardous or potentially hazardous condition, by well plugging and abandonment, decommissioning the production facilities, or both, at a well of an operator subject to the requirements of this section.

(c) The failure to file, for any well, the fee required under this section shall be conclusive evidence of desertion of the well, permitting the supervisor to order the well abandoned pursuant to Section 3237.

(d) This section does not prohibit a local agency from collecting a fee for regulation of wells.

(e) Subject to the approval of the division, an idle well shall not be subject to the requirements of this section if the operator has made a
 diligent effort to locate and access the well, and provided documentation of those efforts demonstrating that it is infeasible to locate or physically access the wellbore.

(f) This section does not apply to an idle well that is the subject of a court-approved settlement agreement entered into on or before December 31, 2024, between a local governmental entity and the operator of the idle well, if that settlement agreement imposes more stringent requirements relating to the management and elimination of idle wells than the requirements imposed by the amendments to this section made by Assembly Bill 1866 of the 2023–24 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 163.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3206.1.

(a) By June 1, 2018, the division shall review, evaluate, and update its regulations pertaining to idle wells. The update shall include idle well testing and management requirements that, at a minimum, include all of the following:

(1) Appropriate testing, as determined by the supervisor, to determine whether the fluid level is above the base of an underground source of drinking water.

(2) Appropriate testing, as determined by the supervisor, to verify the mechanical integrity of the well.

(3) Appropriate remediation, as determined by the supervisor,
 of idle wells if there is an indication of a lack of mechanical integrity.

(4) For a well that has been an idle well for 15 years or more, an engineering analysis demonstrating to the division’s satisfaction that it is viable to return the idle well to operation in the future.

(b) If the operator demonstrates to the division’s satisfaction that the well is not within one-half mile of an underground source of drinking water, testing required under the regulations implementing this section shall not be required until at least two years after the well becomes an idle well. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit or limit any other testing required under this chapter.

(c) At the discretion of the
 supervisor, the regulations implementing this section may provide an option for temporary or partial well abandonment in lieu of compliance with the requirements of the regulations implementing this section.

(d) If the operator does not remediate an idle well as required by the regulations implementing this section, or the operator does not demonstrate that an idle well is economically viable as required by the regulations implementing this section, then the operator shall plug and abandon the idle well in accordance with Section 3208.

(e) Failure to file to comply with the requirements of the regulations implementing this section shall be conclusive evidence of desertion of the well, permitting the supervisor to order the well abandoned pursuant to Section 3237.

(f) For purposes of this section, an “underground source of drinking water” has the same meaning as in the federal Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300f).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 272, Sec. 11.   (AB 2729)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3206.1.5.

(a) On or before March 1, 2025, the division shall identify all low-production wells that are located in a county of the first class in an oil field that is adjacent to a state recreation area or state park and is located, in whole or in part, within the boundary of the Baldwin Hills Conservancy. The division shall determine the length of time those low-production wells have continuously been low-production wells. The division shall consider whether and for how long a well was shut-in for maintenance and subtract that
 from the calculation of the length of time a well meets the definition of a low-production well.

(b) On or before March 1, 2026, the division shall notify the owners of low-production wells identified in subdivision (a) of the prohibition on operating a low-production well for more than 12 months, as described in subdivision (c).

(c) Commencing March 1, 2026, a well identified pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be a low-production well for more than 12 months.

(d) The supervisor shall charge an administrative penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per month to a low-production well owner in violation of subdivision (c) until the low-production well is plugged and abandoned pursuant to Section 3208. Penalties shall
 be remitted annually on a schedule determined by the supervisor. The low-production well site shall not be required to be remediated until oil and gas operations cease.

(e) The division shall waive the penalty in subdivision (d) on a low-production well when the owner submits a request for approval of a notice of intention pursuant to Section 3203 to plug and abandon the well. If work to plug and abandon the well does not start before the notice of intention expires, the division shall resume assessing the penalty on the well owner. A well owner who has an approved notice of intention to plug and abandon a well in accordance with Section 3208 shall not apply for approval of another notice of intention to plug and abandon the same well in a two-year period unless the supervisor determines that the well poses a present danger to life, health,
 or natural resources.

(f) (1) All funds collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Equitable Community Repair and Reinvestment Account, which is hereby created in the State Treasury as a special fund administered by the Department of Conservation. 

(2) Funds from the account shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Conservation for allocation to a county of the first class.
 The county may contract with entities within its jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, cities, state conservancies, joint powers authorities, and nonprofit organizations to use the funds for projects listed in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, to the extent that these projects benefit communities living within two and one-half miles of the oil wells identified in subdivision (a).

(A) Park creation or expansion and maintenance of new outdoor amenities in park-poor neighborhoods.

(B) Urban greening.

(C) Affordable housing needed to accommodate community needs.

(D) Climate mitigation and resilience. 

(E) Community benefit projects with environmental cobenefits.

(3) (A) The Legislature shall not allow the account balance to exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000).

(B) Until December 31, 2030, the Legislature shall not allow the account balance to exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000) once 50 percent of all wells that meet the conditions specified in subdivision (a) have been plugged and abandoned.

(C) Commencing January 1, 2031, the Legislature shall not allow the account balance to exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000) once 50 percent of all wells that meet the conditions specified
 in paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) have been plugged and abandoned.

(g) (1) All wells, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 3008, that are located in a county of the first class in an oil field that is adjacent to a state recreation area or state park and is located, in whole or in part, within the boundary of the Baldwin Hills Conservancy shall be plugged and abandoned by December 31, 2030.

(2) An owner of an idle well or long-term idle well that is located in a county of the first class in an oil field that is adjacent to a state recreation area or state park and is located, in whole or in part, within the boundary of the Baldwin Hills Conservancy
 may adjust the terms of an idle well management plan required pursuant to Section 3206, as needed, to accomplish the plugging and abandonment of those covered wells by December 31, 2030.

(3) (A) On and after January 1, 2031, the supervisor shall charge an administrative penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per month to a well owner in violation of paragraph (1) until the well is plugged and abandoned pursuant to Section 3208.

(B) The supervisor shall not charge an administrative penalty pursuant to subparagraph (A) for a violation by a well owner if the supervisor has already charged an administrative penalty to that well owner for
 a violation, applicable to the same well and covering the same time period, pursuant to subdivision (d).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 549, Sec. 3.   (AB 2716)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3206.2.

(a) (1) The division, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall initiate a study to be conducted by independent experts of fugitive emissions from idle, idle-deserted, and abandoned wells in the state. The independent experts selected shall have experience measuring and documenting emissions from multiple idle and abandoned wells and well sites, preferably at multiple locations within the state.

(2) In developing the parameters of the study, the division shall seek input from researchers with expertise in fugitive emissions, oil and gas operators, and people with relevant experience in nongovernmental organizations. The parameters of the study shall (A) be conducted based on a total well sample not to exceed 500 wells, (B)
 utilize existing information and technology tools that allow data collection without disruption to a well site, (C) limit surface disturbance associated with any emissions sampling, and (D) limit the total cost of the study to a maximum of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(3) In implementing the study, the division shall seek to minimize costs to operators, and the testing conducted pursuant to this section shall not conflict with a scheduled routine maintenance operation of the well or associated equipment.

(4) The study shall be conducted to measure emissions of air pollutants, including, but not limited to, greenhouse gases, toxic air contaminants, and volatile organic compounds, from idle wells, idle-deserted wells, and abandoned wells that can contribute to climate change or endanger occupational and public health and safety through their toxicological properties.

(5) The division shall work with the independent experts, oil and gas operators, and nongovernmental organizations to identify a stratified random sample of wells, and set of pollutants to be measured, from which measurement data can be used to extrapolate to the total number of idle, idle-deserted, and abandoned wells in the state. To the maximum extent possible, the sample shall include emissions data already collected from wells in the state.

(6) The sample of wells shall include idle-deserted wells identified by the division, previously abandoned wells, and idle wells that are ordered or permitted to be plugged and abandoned by the division.

(7) For purposes of undertaking the study, for a well that is selected for measurement as part of the sample but which is also scheduled to be plugged, abandoned, or
 reabandoned, before the initiation of physical work to plug, abandon, or reabandon the well the division or the contracted independent experts, with oversight from the division, shall have testing performed for leaks on the well and associated equipment either (A) in accordance with the United States Environmental Protection Agency Reference Method 21, as set forth in Appendix A-7 to Part 60 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as it read on January 1, 2019, (B) by using an optical gas imaging instrument that is operated by a technician with a certification or training in infrared theory, infrared inspections, and heat transfer principles, or (C) in accordance with an alternative methodology developed for the purposes of this study.

(8) If, pursuant to paragraph (7), a well is found to emit hydrocarbons in observable quantities using an optical imaging device or in concentrations greater than 1 percent by volume using a United States
 Environmental Protection Agency Reference Method 21 instrument when tested before the initiation of physical work, the division or the contracted independent experts shall ensure additional testing is performed using a direct measurement method consisting of high volume sampling, bagging, or a calibrated flow measuring instrument to determine the flow rate of atmospheric emissions of total and speciated hydrocarbon pollutants before the initiation of physical work.

(b) Oil and gas operators with wells selected for purposes of sampling under this section shall make reasonable efforts to permit access to the wells to the division and the independent experts contracted to undertake the study if adequate notice is provided to the operator to ensure appropriate safety precautions are taken at the well site. All oil and gas operators with wells selected for sampling shall submit to the division a certification stating that no action was taken to
 reduce emissions from the sampling site within 72 hours of the sampling taking place so as to reduce the value of measurements taken.

(c) On or before January 1, 2026, the department shall post all results of testing conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) on the department’s internet website in a machine-readable format. On or before January 1, 2021, the department shall produce and post to the department’s internet website an interim progress report describing the status of the study conducted pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, the number of wells where testing has been completed, the number of wells remaining to be tested, study costs, and any preliminary testing results, as available and subject to the requirement described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(d) (1) On or before July 1, 2026, the independent experts contracted to
 undertake the study shall complete a written document that includes an executive summary of the findings, a description of the results, the findings, and an estimate of hydrocarbon emissions from the state’s idle, idle-deserted, and abandoned wells.

(2) Before public release pursuant to subdivision (e), the written document shall be provided for peer review and comments, to the operators whose wells were included in the sample, and to a group of independent experts and nongovernmental organizations selected by the division.

(e) On or before January 1, 2028, the division shall make the results of the study, as per the written document required pursuant to subdivision (d), available on its internet website.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is
 repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 848, Sec. 2.   (AB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3206.3.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before July 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, the supervisor shall, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, prepare and transmit to the Legislature a comprehensive report on the status of idle and long-term idle wells for the preceding calendar year. The report shall include all of the following:

(A) A list of all idle and long-term idle wells in the state by American Petroleum Institute identification number and indicating the operator, field, and pool.

(B) A list of all wells whose idle or long-term idle status changed in the preceding year by American Petroleum Institute identification number
 with the disposition and current status of each well.

(C) A list of orphan wells remaining, the estimated costs of abandoning those orphan wells, and a timeline for future orphan well abandonment with a specific schedule of goals. Idle and long-term idle wells that have become orphan wells shall be identified in the list. For the purposes of this report, an orphan well is a well that has no party responsible for it, leaving the state to plug and abandon it.

(D) A list of all operators with plans filed with the supervisor for the management and elimination of all long-term idle wells and the status of those plans.

(E) A list of all wells for which the division has approved a demonstration of inaccessibility under subdivision (e) of Section 3206.

(F) Any
 additional relevant information as determined by the supervisor.

(2) The report shall be made publicly available and an electronic version shall be available on the division’s internet website.

(b) For the report due on or before July 1, 2022, and each report thereafter, the division shall do both of the following:

(1) Conduct inspections of production facilities attendant to long-term idle wells to ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter. Information summarizing violations and pertinent findings in these inspections shall be included in the applicable report required to be prepared and transmitted pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) Identify idle wells by the American Petroleum Institute identification number that are registered to an
 operator and that have met the definition of an idle well for three years where neither the required annual fee has been paid or the well is part of a valid idle well management plan on file with the supervisor pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3206.

(c) For the report due on or before July 1, 2023, and each report thereafter, the division shall provide a description of activities undertaken by the division’s collections unit established pursuant to Section 3243. This description shall include the number of operators and amounts of idle well fees collected by the collections unit in the preceding year, the criteria, including timelines, used by the collections unit to determine a well or attendant facility is deserted, and the amount of costs recovered from operators or responsible parties for work ordered by the supervisor or undertaken by the division. Information related to the division’s use of liens, including, but not limited to, the
 number of wells and facilities eligible to be subject to a lien, the number of liens placed by the supervisor, and the number of liens released by the supervisor, shall also be provided.

(d) Information on how to access the plans described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be made readily available on the division’s internet website.

(e) The division shall continue to regularly provide updated information describing idle and long-term idle wells on the division’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 548, Sec. 2.   (AB 1866)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3206.5.

(a) Any city or county may request from the supervisor a list of all idle wells, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3008, within its jurisdiction.

(b) After receiving the list from the supervisor, the city or county may identify idle wells identified pursuant to subdivision (a) within its jurisdiction which it has determined, based on a competent, professional evaluation, have no reasonable expectation of being reactivated, and formally request the supervisor to make a determination whether the wells should be plugged and abandoned.

(c) Upon receiving the written request of a city or
 county, as specified in subdivision (b):

(1) The supervisor may, within 60 days of receiving a written request from a city or county, require the operator or operators to file a statement for each well outlining those reasons why the wells should not be plugged and abandoned.

(2) The supervisor shall, within 120 days of receiving a written request, make a determination as to whether any of these wells should be plugged and abandoned, pursuant to the criteria contained in this chapter.

(d) Failure of the operator to file, for any well, the statement required under this section shall be conclusive evidence of desertion of the well, thereby permitting the supervisor to order the well
 abandoned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 652, Sec. 3.   (SB 724)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3207.

(a) Any individual or blanket indemnity bond issued in compliance with this chapter may be terminated and canceled and the surety relieved of all obligations thereunder when the well or wells covered by such bond have been properly abandoned pursuant to Section 3208, or another valid bond has been substituted therefor. Should the person who has filed a blanket bond properly abandon a portion of his or her wells covered by the bond, the bond may be terminated and canceled and the surety relieved of all obligations thereunder upon the filing by such person of an individual bond for each well that is still not abandoned. Liability as to individual wells that have been properly abandoned under a blanket bond may also be
 terminated.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 13) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 272, Sec. 4.   (AB 2729)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3208.

(a) For the purposes of Sections 3206 and 3207, a well is properly abandoned when it has been shown, to the satisfaction of the supervisor, that all proper steps have been taken to isolate all oil-bearing or gas-bearing strata encountered in the well, and to protect underground or surface water suitable for irrigation or farm or domestic purposes from the infiltration or addition of any detrimental substance and to prevent subsequent damage to life, health, property, and other resources. For purposes of this subdivision, proper steps include the plugging of the well, decommissioning the attendant production facilities of the well, or both, if determined necessary by the supervisor.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 15) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 272, Sec. 4.   (AB 2729)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3208.1.

(a) To prevent, as far as possible, damage to life, health, and property, the supervisor or district deputy may order, or permit, the reabandonment of any previously abandoned well if the supervisor or the district deputy has reason to question the integrity of the previous abandonment, or if the well is not accessible or visible.

(b) The operator responsible for plugging and abandoning deserted wells under Section 3237 shall be responsible for the reabandonment except in the following situations:

(1) The supervisor finds that the operator plugged and abandoned the well in
 conformity with the requirements of this division in effect at the time of the plugging and abandonment and that the well in its current condition presents no immediate danger to life, health, and property but requires additional work solely because the owner of the property on which the well is located proposes construction on the property that would prevent or impede access to the well for purposes of remedying a currently perceived future problem. In this situation, the owner of the property on which the well is located shall obtain all rights necessary to reabandon the well and be responsible for the reabandonment.

(2) The supervisor finds that the operator plugged and abandoned the well in conformity with the requirements of this division in effect at the time of the plugging and abandonment and that construction over or near the well
 preventing or impeding access to it was begun on or after January 1, 1988, and the property owner, developer, or local agency permitting the construction failed either to obtain an opinion from the supervisor or district deputy as to whether the previously abandoned well is required to be reabandoned or to follow the advice of the supervisor or district deputy not to undertake the construction. In this situation, the person or entity causing the construction over or near the well shall be responsible for the reabandonment.

(3) The supervisor finds that the operator plugged and abandoned the well in conformity with the requirements of this division in effect at the time of the plugging and abandonment and after that time someone other than the operator or an affiliate of the operator disturbed the integrity of the abandonment in the course
 of developing the property, and the supervisor is able to determine based on credible evidence, including circumstantial evidence, the party or parties responsible for disturbing the integrity of the abandonment. In this situation, the party or parties responsible for disturbing the integrity of the abandonment shall be responsible for the reabandonment.

(c) For purposes of this section, being responsible for the reabandonment means that the responsible party or parties shall complete the reabandonment and be subject to the requirements of this chapter as an operator of the well. The responsible party or parties shall file with the supervisor the appropriate bond or security in an amount specified in Section 3204, 3205, or 3205.1. If the reabandonment is not completed, the supervisor may act under Section 3226 to complete the work.

(d) Except for the situations listed in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (b), nothing in this section precludes the application of Article 4.2 (commencing with Section 3250) when its application would be appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 272, Sec. 17.   (AB 2729)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3209.
